Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-595
Class IV school district; associate superintendent of business affairs; duties.

The associate superintendent of business affairs of a Class IV school district shall (1) take charge of the books and documents of the board of education, (2) countersign all warrants for school money, (3) apply for and receive school funds from the county treasurer or other persons to whom such funds are payable by law and deposit the funds with the treasurer of the board, and (4) perform all such other duties as the board may require.

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 348.